California, session 20252026, AB2590.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) California’s natural and working landscapes, including farms, ranches, forests, and coastal lands, provide vital ecosystem services, including habitat connectivity, biodiversity conservation, water quality, wildfire resilience, climate adaptation, carbon sequestration, and agricultural production.(2) Conservation of natural and working lands supports wildlife habitat, climate adaptation, and the prevention of incompatible development, consistent with the missions of multiple state programs, including those administered by the Wildlife Conservation Board and the Department of Conservation.(3) California is home to numerous military installations whose missions depend on compatible surrounding land uses. Voluntary conservation of natural and working lands can help prevent incompatible development that could affect military readiness.(4) The federal Sentinel Landscapes Partnership is a collaborative effort of the United States Department of Defense, the United States Department of Agriculture, and the United States Department of the Interior to coordinate federal conservation and working lands programs in landscapes where military readiness, ecosystem conservation, and agricultural economies coexist.(5) Voluntary conservation measures such as conservation easements, land protection, and compatible land uses help sustain rural economies, protect natural resources, and support long-term ecological outcomes.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this bill to do both of the following:(1) Clarify that state conservation programs may support voluntary land conservation activities consistent with federal sentinel landscape objectives.(2) Establish a coordinated state function to support designation and implementation of federal sentinel landscapes in California.SEC. 2. Division 9.5 (commencing with Section 9975) is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:DIVISION 9.5. CALIFORNIA SENTINEL LANDSCAPES ACT CHAPTER 1. General Provisions9975. This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Sentinel Landscapes Act.9976. For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:(a) “Candidate sentinel landscape” means a landscape in California being evaluated or prepared for nomination to the federal Sentinel Landscapes Partnership.(b) “Conservation easement” has the same meaning as defined in Section 815.1 of the Civil Code.(c) “Federally designated sentinel landscape” means a terrestrial area recognized by the federal Sentinel Landscapes Partnership based on the coexistence of military readiness, working lands, and conservation priorities.(d) “Working lands” includes agricultural lands, rangelands, and managed forests that support economic production while providing ecological benefits. CHAPTER 2. Federal Sentinel Landscapes in California9980. (a) The Natural Resources Agency shall designate a Sentinel Landscapes Program Manager to coordinate state participation in the federal Sentinel Landscapes Partnership.(b) The Sentinel Landscapes Program Manager shall do all of the following:(1) Support identification of candidate sentinel landscapes in California for designation as federal sentinel landscapes and assist in the preparation of applications or proposals to the federal Sentinel Landscapes Partnership. This includes facilitating communication and coordination among state agencies, federal partners, local governments, federally recognized Indian tribes, land trusts, nonprofit conservation organizations, and other stakeholders for those purposes.(2) Coordinate with the United States Department of Defense, United States Department of Agriculture, United States Department of the Interior, other federal departments and agencies as appropriate, and the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation relevant state agencies regarding military installation compatibility planning to align federal and state conservation investments within federally designated or candidate sentinel landscapes.(3) Work with state agencies that have conservation grant or easement authority, including the Wildlife Conservation Board, Department of Conservation, State Coastal Conservancy, Sierra Nevada Conservancy, Department of Fish and Wildlife, and other relevant agencies or conservancies to identify opportunities to align funding strategies consistent with federal sentinel landscape objectives and each agency’s statutory mission.(4)Facilitate communication and coordination among state agencies, federal partners, local governments, federally recognized Indian tribes, land trusts, nonprofit conservation organizations, and other stakeholders involved in the federal Sentinel Landscapes Partnership.(5)(4) Prepare, on a biennial basis, a summary of opportunities, collaborative projects, leveraged funding, and outcomes relating to federal sentinel landscape designations in California. This summary may be incorporated into existing natural resources or climate adaptation reports.(c) State agencies that have conservation grant or easement authority shall, to the extent feasible and consistent with their existing statutory authority, cooperate with the Sentinel Landscapes Program Manager in implementing this section.9981. (a) In addition to the purposes otherwise authorized by law, the Wildlife Conservation Board may do both of the following:(1)Provide provide grants for habitat protection, restoration, and enhancement projects that are located within, are adjacent to, or contribute to the ecological connectivity and conservation objectives of within a federally designated sentinel landscape.(2)Acquire real property or any interest in real property, including conservation easements, in connection with a project described in paragraph (1).(b) Projects funded pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall independently further the Wildlife Conservation Board’s statutory purposes relating to wildlife habitat conservation, ecological connectivity, working lands habitat conservation, or wildlife-oriented public access, and shall meet applicable eligibility criteria of the relevant Wildlife Conservation Board program.(c) The Wildlife Conservation Board may coordinate with federal departments and agencies participating in the federal Sentinel Landscapes Partnership and other entities to align conservation investments within and adjacent to federally designated sentinel landscapes and to leverage federal funds, technical assistance, or matching grants.(d) Projects supported pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall remain voluntary and shall not impose regulatory requirements beyond those otherwise applicable under state or federal law.(e) (1) The California Sentinel Landscapes Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.(2) The Wildlife Conservation Board may accept for deposit into the fund federal funds, grants, and gifts and donations, including interest earned, that are designated and required by the donor to be used exclusively for the purposes of projects under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the Wildlife Conservation Board to implement projects under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).9982. In evaluating applications for grants pursuant to the Sustainable Agricultural Lands Conservation Program, the Department of Conservation and the Strategic Growth Council may may, to the extent not in conflict with the programs, give priority consideration to projects that are located within, are adjacent to, or contribute to the objectives of within a federally designated sentinel landscape, provided that the project meets all other eligibility requirements of the Sustainable Agricultural Lands Conservation Program. landscape.9983. In awarding grants or approving projects evaluating applications for grants under State Coastal Conservancy programs, the State Coastal Conservancy may, to the extent not in conflict with those programs, give priority consideration to projects that are located within, are adjacent to, or contribute to the ecological connectivity and conservation objectives of within a federally designated sentinel landscape, provided that those projects are consistent with the statutory mission and purposes of the State Coastal Conservancy. These funds allocated by the State Coastal Conservancy shall be available for acquisition, restoration, and enhancement of land and water resources.9984. In awarding grants or approving projects evaluating applications for grants under Sierra Nevada Conservancy programs, the Sierra Nevada Conservancy may, to the extent not in conflict with those programs, give priority consideration to projects that are located within, are adjacent to, or contribute to the ecological connectivity and conservation objectives of within a federally designated sentinel landscape, provided that those projects are consistent with the statutory mission and purposes of the Sierra Nevada Conservancy.9985. The Natural Resources Agency, in collaboration with the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, Department of Conservation, Wildlife Conservation Board, State Coastal Conservancy, Sierra Nevada Conservancy, Department of Fish and Wildlife, and other relevant state entities, shall regularly consult on how to align conservation opportunities with state and federal landscape protection goals. CHAPTER 3. Implementation9990. Implementation of this division is contingent upon the availability of federal funds, grants, gifts, donations, or other non-General Fund resources available to support the purposes of this division.9991. Nothing in this division limits or replaces the existing statutory missions, authorities, or responsibilities of any state agency.SEC. 3. Section 10230.2 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:10230.2. (a) The California Farmland Conservancy Program is hereby established in the department.(b) The program may offer financial assistance, including grants or contracts, for projects and activities on agricultural lands that support agricultural conservation and sustainable land management, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(1) Acquisition of agricultural conservation easements or fee title to protect the land’s agricultural use or capacity, including projects that align with landscape-scale conservation objectives identified in a federally designated sentinel landscape, capacity that meets the following requirements:(A) The primary purpose for which the easement or fee title is being sought is consistent with continuing agricultural use of the property.(B) The easement or fee title does not, and will not, substantially prevent agricultural uses on the property.(C) Any nonagricultural qualities that will be protected by the easement or fee title, if applicable, are inherent to the property.(2) Improvements to land protected by a conservation easement, deed restriction, or similar long-term agreement as determined by the director.(3) Plans to protect and conserve agricultural lands and plans to protect, conserve, restore, or enhance resources or values located on, or adjacent to, agricultural lands or that were historically present on agricultural lands. These may include, but are not limited to, either of the following:(A) An agricultural land component or element of a general plan developed pursuant to Section 65565 of the Government Code.(B) Land conservation strategies and plans to identify and develop potential projects.(4) Technical assistance to develop projects, prepare applications, and implement projects.(5) Administrative costs incurred by the department to administer the program.(6) Any other purposes approved by the Legislature in a funding appropriation for the program.(c) When evaluating applications pursuant to this division, the department may give priority consideration to projects that are located within federally designated sentinel landscapes.